Illinois, session 104th, SB2712.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Immigration Enforcement Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Citizenship or immigration status" means all matters 8regarding citizenship of the United States or any other 9country or the authority to reside in or otherwise be present 10in the United States.11    "Contact information" means home address, work address, 12telephone number, email address, social media information, or 13any other personal identifying information that could be used 14as a means to contact an individual.15    "Immigration agent" means an agent of the United States 16Immigration and Customs Enforcement, the United States Customs 17and Border Protection, or any similar or successor agency.18    "Immigration enforcement" means any and all efforts to 19investigate, enforce, or assist in the investigation or 20enforcement of any federal civil immigration law. "Immigration 21enforcement" includes any and all efforts to investigate, 22enforce, or assist in the investigation or enforcement of any 23federal criminal immigration law that penalizes a person's   SB2712- 2 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1presence in, entry or reentry to, or employment in the United 2States.3    "Law enforcement agency" means an agency of the State or 4unit of local government charged with the enforcement of 5State, county, or municipal laws or with managing custody of 6detained persons in the State.7    "Law enforcement official" means any individual with the 8power to arrest or detain individuals, including law 9enforcement officers, corrections officers, and others 10employed or designated by a law enforcement agency. "Law 11enforcement official" includes any probation officer. 12    Section 10. School notification.13    (a) By July 1, 2026, every school district must review its 14comprehensive school safety plan, and amend, if necessary, its 15comprehensive school safety plan to include procedures 16specifically designed to notify parents and guardians of 17pupils, teachers, administrators, and school personnel when 18the school confirms the presence of immigration enforcement on 19school premises.20    (b) The content and timing of a notification provided 21under subsection (a) shall consider the safety and well-being 22of the pupils, employees, and community members on school 23premises when determining how and when to issue the 24notification to parents and guardians of pupils, teachers, 25administrators, and school personnel.  SB2712- 3 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1    This notification may also include a hyperlink to 2additional resources for families with information about their 3educational rights, State laws that protect parents' and 4students' privacy and confidentiality, and, if available, 5counseling or support services, which may include services 6that support families impacted by immigration enforcement and 7model policies adopted by the local educational agency.8    A notice provided under this subsection shall not include 9any personally identifiable information.10    (c) By July 1, 2026, postsecondary educational entities, 11and each campus of those postsecondary educational entities, 12shall make good faith efforts to notify, as specified, all 13students, faculty, and staff who work on campus when the 14presence of immigration enforcement is confirmed on campus.15    (d) A notice provided under subsection (c) shall include 16all of the following:17        (1) The date and time the immigration enforcement was 18    confirmed.19        (2) The location of the confirmed immigration 20    enforcement.21        (3) A hyperlink to additional resources, including the 22    information posted on its Internet website.23    A notice provided under this subsection shall not include 24any personally identifiable information. 25    Section 15. Patient access and protection.  SB2712- 4 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1    (a) A health care provider entity shall, to the extent 2possible, establish or amend procedures for monitoring, 3documenting, and receiving visitors to health care provider 4entities consistent with this Section. Health care provider 5entities are encouraged to post a notice to authorities at 6health care provider entity facility entrances.7    (b) Health care provider entity personnel shall 8immediately notify health care provider entity management, 9administration, or legal counsel of any request for access to 10a health care provider entity site or patient for immigration 11enforcement.12    Health care provider entity personnel shall immediately 13provide any requests for review of health care provider entity 14documents, including through a lawfully issued subpoena, 15warrant, or court order, to health care provider entity 16management, administration, or legal counsel.17    If a request is made to access a health care provider 18entity site or patient, including to obtain information about 19a patient or the patient's family, for immigration 20enforcement, health care provider entity personnel shall 21direct that request to the designated health care provider 22entity management, administrator, or legal counsel.23    (c) To enhance privacy available to health care provider 24entity facility users and promote a safe environment conducive 25to the health care provider entity facility's mission and 26patient care, a health care provider entity shall designate   SB2712- 5 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1areas where patients are receiving treatment or care or where 2a patient is discussing protected health information as 3nonpublic. The health care provider entity facility is 4encouraged to designate these areas through mapping, signage, 5key entry, policy, or a combination of those.6    (d) Unless required by State or federal law, a health care 7provider entity and its personnel shall not allow any person 8access to the nonpublic areas of the health care provider 9entity facility for immigration enforcement purposes, unless 10that person has a valid judicial warrant or court order that 11specifically grants access to the nonpublic areas of the 12health care provider entity facility.13    (e) A health care provider entity and its personnel shall, 14to the extent possible, have the denial of permission for 15access to nonpublic areas of the health care provider entity 16facility witnessed and documented by at least one health care 17provider entity personnel.18    (f) Health care provider entities shall inform staff and 19relevant volunteers on how to respond to requests relating to 20immigration enforcement that grants access to health care 21provider entity sites or to patients.22    (g) This Section does not prohibit a person who is in 23lawful custody from being accompanied to access health care 24services and for the person's transportation and arrangement 25to health care provider entities, and does not prohibit any 26person from entering nonpublic areas of a hospital to receive   SB2712- 6 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1care for the person or someone in the person's care or custody.2    (h) For purposes of this Section, "health care provider 3entity" includes all of the following:4        (1) Public hospitals or nonpublic hospitals.5            (A) For the purposes of this subsection, "public 6        hospital" means a hospital that is licensed to a 7        county, a city, a city and county, the State, a local 8        health care district, a local health authority, or any 9        other political subdivision of the State.10            (B) For purposes of this subsection, "nonpublic 11        hospital" means a hospital that meets both of the 12        following conditions:13                (i) the hospital does not meet the definition 14            of a public hospital under subparagraph (A); and15                (ii) the hospital is licensed as a general 16            acute care hospital.17        (2) Clinics.18        (3) A physician organization.19        (4) Other health care providers that deliver or 20    furnish services related to physical or mental health and 21    wellness. 22    Section 20. Deportation Defense Grant Program.23    (a) The Deportation Defense Grant Program is established 24through the Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority. 25This Program, totaling $3,000,000 a year, shall be used for   SB2712- 7 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1the hiring of a public defender to assist those who will act as 2an attorney to a noncitizen in an immigration case or for a 3nonprofit who assists in the immigration legal casework.4    (b) When awarding grant funds from the Program, the 5following shall be taken into consideration:6        (1) Geographic diversity.7        (2) Demographic diversity.8        (3) The current size of county public defender office, 9    if applicable. 10    Section 25. The Counties Code is amended by changing 11Section 3-4006 as follows: 12    (55 ILCS 5/3-4006)  (from Ch. 34, par. 3-4006)13    Sec. 3-4006. Duties of public defender. The Public 14Defender, as directed by the court, shall act as attorney, 15without fee, before any court within any county for all 16persons who are held in custody or who are charged with the 17commission of any criminal offense, and who the court finds 18are unable to employ counsel.19    The Public Defender shall be the attorney, without fee, 20when so appointed by the court under Section 1-5 of the 21Juvenile Court Act of 1987.22    In cases subject to Section 5-170 of the Juvenile Court 23Act of 1987 involving a minor who was under 15 years of age at 24the time of the commission of the offense, that occurs in a   SB2712- 8 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1county with a full-time public defender office, a public 2defender, without fee or appointment, may represent and have 3access to a minor during a custodial interrogation. In cases 4subject to Section 5-170 of the Juvenile Court Act of 1987 5involving a minor who was under 15 years of age at the time of 6the commission of the offense, that occurs in a county without 7a full-time public defender, the law enforcement agency 8conducting the custodial interrogation shall ensure that the 9minor is able to consult with an attorney who is under contract 10with the county to provide public defender services. 11Representation by the public defender shall terminate at the 12first court appearance if the court determines that the minor 13is not indigent.14    Every court shall, with the consent of the defendant and 15where the court finds that the rights of the defendant would be 16prejudiced by the appointment of the public defender, appoint 17counsel other than the public defender, except as otherwise 18provided in Section 113-3 of the "Code of Criminal Procedure 19of 1963". That counsel shall be compensated as is provided by 20law. He shall also, in the case of the conviction of any such 21person, prosecute any proceeding in review which in his 22judgment the interests of justice require.23    In any county in this State counties with a population 24over 3,000,000, the public defender, without fee or 25appointment and with the concurrence of the county board, may 26act as attorney to noncitizens in immigration cases.   SB2712- 9 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1Representation by the public defender in immigration cases 2shall be limited to those arising in immigration courts 3located within the geographical boundaries of the county where 4the public defender has been appointed to office unless the 5board authorizes the public defender to provide representation 6outside the county. 7(Source: P.A. 102-410, eff. 1-1-22; 102-1117, eff. 1-13-23.) 8    Section 30. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 9changing Section 2-130 as follows: 10    (625 ILCS 5/2-130)11    Sec. 2-130. User of automated license plate readers; 12prohibitions.13    (a) As used in this Section:14    "Automated license plate reader" or "ALPR" means an 15electronic device that is mounted on a law enforcement vehicle 16or positioned in a stationary location and that is capable of 17recording data on or taking a photograph of a vehicle or its 18license plate and comparing the collected data and photographs 19to existing law enforcement databases for investigative 20purposes. "ALPR" includes a device that is owned or operated 21by a person or an entity other than a law enforcement agency to 22the extent that data collected by the reader is shared with a 23law enforcement agency.24    "ALPR information" means information gathered by an ALPR   SB2712- 10 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1or created from the analysis of data generated by an ALPR. 2    "ALPR systems" means multi-agency or vendor agreements 3that allow the sharing of ALPR information collected in 4Illinois.5    "ALPR user" means a person or entity that owns or operates 6an ALPR device. 7    "Law enforcement agency" means a State or local agency, 8unit of local government, or private entity charged with the 9enforcement of State, county, or municipal laws or with 10managing custody of detained persons in any state or 11jurisdiction.12    (b) An ALPR user shall not sell, share, allow access to, or 13transfer ALPR information to any state or local jurisdiction 14for the purpose of investigating or enforcing a law that:15        (1) denies or interferes with a person's right to 16    choose or obtain reproductive health care services or any 17    lawful health care services as defined by the Lawful 18    Health Care Activity Act; or19        (2) permits the detention or investigation of a person 20    based on the person's immigration status.21    (c) Any ALPR user in this State, including any law 22enforcement agency of this State that uses ALPR systems, shall 23not share ALPR information with an out-of-state law 24enforcement agency or federal immigration agency without first 25obtaining a written declaration from the out-of-state law 26enforcement agency that it expressly affirms that ALPR   SB2712- 11 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1information obtained shall not be used in a manner that 2violates subsection (b). If a written declaration of 3affirmation is not executed, the law enforcement agency shall 4not share the ALPR information with the out-of-state law 5enforcement agency or federal immigration agency.6    (d) ALPR information shall be held confidentially to the 7fullest extent permitted by law.8    (e) Nothing in this Act shall define or limit any rights 9under the Reproductive Health Act. 10    (f) Absent exigent circumstances and subject to the 11limitations of subsection (b), ALPR information may be shared 12by a law enforcement agency only for purposes of locating 13vehicles or persons if there is probable cause of being 14involved in the commission of a criminal offense.15    (g) Before a request for ALPR information may be 16processed, a law enforcement agency must obtain and review a 17police report to ensure compliance with subsection (b).18    (h) After a request for ALPR information has been granted 19and the information has been shared, the relevant information 20may only be accessed or retained for a maximum of 15 days 21before a new request is required.22    (i) ALPR information shall not be preserved for more than 2315 days by a law enforcement agency except it may be preserved 24for more than 15 days as part of an ongoing investigation as 25long as the captured plate data is confirmed as matching an 26alert and is destroyed at the conclusion of either:  SB2712- 12 -LRB104 15775 LNS 28965 b1        (1) an investigation that does not result in any 2    criminal charges being filed; or3        (2) any criminal action undertaken in the matter 4    involving the captured plate data.5    (j) An ALPR system that gives out information in violation 6of this Section shall be liable for civil penalties of up to 7$25,000 per violation.8    (k) The commission of a deceptive practice by a law 9enforcement official in violation of this Section is a Class B 10misdemeanor.11    (l) Starting January 1, 2026, each ALPR system shall 12produce an biannual audit report submitted to the Secretary of 13State showing all searches for a police department conducted 14by customers outside of the police department. 15(Source: P.A. 103-540, eff. 1-1-24.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.